Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Service

§ 77-7-171.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 561, § 24, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

[Codes, 1942, § 7670; Laws, 1938, ch. 142]

§ 77-7-173.
Changes in schedules by common carriers.

Common carriers by motor vehicle, the rates of which are subject to regulation under the provisions of this chapter, shall, before making a change in their schedules, give proper notice to the commission of such proposed change. The operation under such changed schedule shall thereafter be lawful unless otherwise ordered by the commission upon objection of an interested party or the commission itself.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7646; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 9; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-175.
Operation of special or chartered parties by common carriers.

Any common carrier by motor vehicle transporting passengers under a certificate issued by the commission may operate to any place special or chartered parties under such reasonable rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7645; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-177.
Deviations from routes by common carriers.

A common carrier by motor vehicle, operating under a certificate issued by the commission, may occasionally deviate from the route over which it is authorized to operate under the certificate, under such general or special rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7643; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 77-7-179.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

[Codes, 1942, § 7644; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; 1958, ch. 508]

§ 77-7-181.
Accident reports.

It shall be the duty of the manager, agent or other proper officer of every motor carrier doing business or operating in this state to present to the commission such report or reports as may be required by it, under oath, of all accidents resulting in injury to persons, equipment, highway or property of any kind, under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7671; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-183.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 561, § 25, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

[Codes, 1942, § 7672; Laws, 1938, ch. 142]

§ 77-7-185.
Commission may require establishment of passenger stations.

After notice and hearing, and an opportunity to be heard by the carrier or carriers affected, the commission may require the establishment of passenger stations at cities and towns where such establishment is shown to be justified by the reasonable public needs. The commission shall give due consideration to the volume of traffic handled by the carrier or carriers to be affected, to and from the city or town where a station is proposed to be located, and the amount of revenue derived therefrom and the cost and expense of establishing and maintaining such station and the effect which the establishment of such station and the maintenance thereof will have upon the ability of the affected carrier or carriers to continue to perform their public service.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7672; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 77-7-187.
Establishment of through routes and joint rates by common carriers.

Common carriers of passengers by motor vehicle may establish reasonable through routes and joint rates with other such common carriers, and shall provide safe and adequate service, equipment and facilities for the transportation of passengers, and shall establish, observe and enforce just and reasonable regulations and practices relating thereto, and to the issuance, form and substance of tickets, the carrying of personal, sample and excess baggage, and the facilities for transportation of passengers. In case of joint rates, fares and charges, it shall be the duty of the carriers party thereto to establish just, reasonable and equitable divisions thereof as between the carriers participating therein which shall not unduly prefer or prejudice any of such participating carriers.

Common carriers of passengers by motor vehicle may establish reasonable through routes and joint rates, fares or charges with common carriers by railroad or water. In case of such joint rates, fares or charges, it shall be the duty of the carriers party thereto to establish just and reasonable regulations and practices in connection therewith, and just, reasonable and equitable divisions thereof as between the carriers participating therein which shall not unduly prefer or prejudice any of such participating carriers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7656, 7658; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 12; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2004.